Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-82] Powers and duties of the
commission. In addition to its other powers and duties, the commission
shall:

(1) Require registration of all existing wells, as
provided in section 174C-83;

(2) Require permits for well construction and for
installation of pumps and pumping equipment as provided in section 174C-84;

(3) Require well completion reports, as provided in
section 174C-85;

(4) Develop well construction and installation
standards for pumps and pumping equipment, as provided in section 174C-86; and

(5) Adopt, modify, and enforce all rules and orders
necessary to carry out this part. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next